tasks/task5/script.foma
# script.foma
# Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
# August 26, 2022

clear
set flag-is-epsilon ON
read lexc verbs.lexc
define Lexicon

#############################
# Rules for handling orthographic alternations ("pago", "pague", "ajo", "agimos" etc.)

define FrontVowel [ e | i ] ;

define BackVowel [ a | o | u ] ;

# "proteger", "agir", etc.
define PhonJ g -> J || _ FrontVowel r %* ;

# "tecer"
define PhonS c -> S || _ FrontVowel r %* ;

# "pagar"
define PhonG g -> G || _ BackVowel r %* ;

# "secar"
define PhonK c -> K || _ BackVowel r %* ;

define Phon PhonJ .o. PhonG .o. PhonS .o. PhonK ;

# "aja"
define OrthoJ J -> j || _ BackVowel ;

# "teço"
define OrthoS S -> ç || _ BackVowel ;

# "pague"
define OrthoG G -> {gu} || _ FrontVowel ;

# "seque"
define OrthoK K -> {qu} || _ FrontVowel ;

# "coce"
define OrthoC ç -> c || _ FrontVowel ;

define Ortho  OrthoJ .o.
              OrthoG .o.
              OrthoS .o.
              OrthoK .o.
              OrthoC .o.
              J -> g .o.
              G -> g .o.
              S -> c .o.
              K -> c;

#############################

# thematic vowels
define TV [ a | e | i ] ;

define MB %^ ;

define STRESS %' ;

# MB Insertion
define MBInsertion [.0.] -> MB || _ TV r "*" ;

# R Deletion: deletion of infinitive suffix "r" of lemma forms
define RDeletion r -> 0 || _ "*" ;

# Asterisk Deletion
define AsteriskDeletion "*" -> 0 ;

# 1st plural suffix
define PL1 {mos} ; ! TODO: MB {mos} .#.

# 2nd plural suffix
define PL2 {is} ; ! TODO: MB {is} .#.

# indicative imperfect
define IMPF MB {va} MB ; ! TODO: MB {va}

# pluperfect
define PQP MB {ra} MB ; ! TODO: see above

# imperfect subjunctive
define SBJP MB {sse} MB ;  ! TODO: see above

# E Replacement: "e" of future indicative suffix "-re" changes to "á" before "s" or at word end (compr^a^^re^ => compr^a^^rá^, compr^a^^re^s => compr^a^^rá^s)
define EReplacement e -> á || MB STRESS r _ MB [s | 0] .#. ;

# I Replacement: thematic vowel "i" changes to "e" in unstressed position (part^i^^s => part^e^^s)
define IReplacement i -> e || MB _ MB MB [s | m | 0 ] .#. ;

# I Elision: "i" is elided in "ii" (part^i^^is => part^i^^s) (Monteiro, 1987, p. 101)
define IElision i -> 0 || MB i MB MB _  ;

# Nasalisation: "e" of future indicative suffixe changes to "ã" before word-final "m" (compr^a^^'re^m => compr^a^^'rã^m)
define Nasalisation e -> ã || MB STRESS r _  MB m .#.;

# M Replacement: "m" of 3rd person plural suffix changes to "o" before future indicative suffixe "rã" (compr^a^^'rã^m => compr^a^^rã^o)
define MReplacement m -> o || ã MB _ ;

# E Raising: thematic vowel "e" changes to "i" before imperfect indicative suffix "va" (vend^e^va^m => vend^i^va^m)
define ERaising e -> i || _ MB {va} MB ;

! TODO: implement the alternation between "va" (1st conjugation) and "a" (2nd and 3rd) in the LEXC grammar?
# V Deletion: "v" of imperfect indicative suffix "va" is deleted when the verb belongs to the 2nd or 3rd conjugation (vend^i^va^m => vend^i^a^m)
define VDeletion v -> 0 || MB  i (STRESS)  MB _ [ a | e ] MB ;

# some morpheme of length 1 followed by the 1st or 2nd plural suffix
define PL12 MB ? MB [ PL1 | PL2 ] .#. ;

# Thematic Vowel I Accentuation: "i" receives acute accent if followed by PL12 (vend^i^a^mos => vend^í^a^mos)
define TVIAccentuation i -> í || _ PL12 ;

# Conditional (Suffix) Accentuation: "i" of COND suffix "ria" receives acute accent if followed by 1fst or 2nd plural suffix
define CondAccentuation i -> í || STRESS r _ ?+ %^ [ PL1 | PL2 ] ; ! TODO: reformulate rule using STRESS

# A Accentuation: thematic vowel "a" receives acute accent before "va" and 1fst or 2nd plural suffixes (compr^a^va^mos => compr^á^va^mos)
define AAccentuation a -> á || _ [IMPF | PQP | SBJP ] [ PL1 | PL2 ] .#. ;

# Thematic Vowel Accentuation: thematic vowel receives acute accent before IMPF, PQP and SBJP suffixes followed by 1fst and 2nd plural suffixes (compr^a^va^mos => compr^á^va^mos)
define TVAccentuation [.0.] -> %' || MB TV _  [IMPF | PQP | SBJP ] [ PL1 | PL2 ] .#. ;

# Replace stress symbol with acute mark
define Acute  a STRESS -> á .o.
              i STRESS -> í .o.
              e STRESS -> ê ;

# A Raising: "a" changes to "e" before 2nd plural suffix (compr^a^ria^is => compr^a^rie^is, vend^í^a^is => vend^í^e^is)
define ARaising a -> e || MB ?+ MB ?* _ MB PL2 .#. ;

# present subjunctive suffixes
define SBJR MB [ e | a ] MB ;

# first singular suffix "o"
define O1SG MB MB o .#. ;

# Thematic Vowel Deletion: thematic vowel is deleted before 1st singular suffix "o" (compr^a^^o => compr^^^o, compr^a^e^ => compr^^e^)
define TVDeletion TV -> 0 || _ [ O1SG | SBJR ] ;

# Lemma form suffix
define LemmaSuff r MB MB ;

# D Insertion
define DInsertion [.0.] -> d || LemmaSuff _ PL2 .#. ;

# I Lowering
define ILowering i -> e || LemmaSuff d _ s .#. ;

# E Insertion
define EInsertion [.0.] -> e || LemmaSuff _ [ s | m ] .#. ;

# SBJF changes
define SBJF DInsertion .o. ILowering .o. EInsertion ;

# MB Cleanup: deletion of morphem boundary and stress symbols
define Cleanup MB -> 0 .o. STRESS -> 0;

define Grammar  Lexicon  .o.
                SBJF .o.
                Phon .o.
                MBInsertion .o.
                RDeletion .o.
                AsteriskDeletion .o.
                IReplacement .o.
                TVDeletion .o.
                EReplacement .o.
                Nasalisation .o.
                MReplacement .o.
                !AAccentuation .o.
                ERaising .o.
                TVAccentuation .o.
                VDeletion .o.
                ARaising .o.
                !TVIAccentuation .o.
                CondAccentuation .o.
                IElision .o.
                Acute .o.
                Cleanup .o.
                Ortho ;

regex Grammar ;
save stack verbs.fst
